Tennessee statutes. Title 41 Correctional Institutions and Inmates
Part 4

TRICOR Inmate Labor Act of 1994

41-22-401. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “TRICOR Inmate Labor Act of 1994.”

Acts 1994, ch. 737, § 1; 2003, ch. 187, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 4, §§ 41-22-401 — 41-22-407 (Acts 1980, ch. 797, §§ 1-7; T.C.A. §§ 41-2601 — 41-2607; Acts 1990, ch. 772, § 1, § 2) concerning the correctional enterprises board, was repealed by Acts 1994, ch. 737, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

Cross-References. Prison work programs, title 41, ch. 22, part 1.

Restitution industries, title 41, ch. 6, part 2.

Road work by inmates, title 41, ch. 22, part 3.

41-22-402. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Equipment” includes, but is not limited to, motor vehicles, industrial machinery, agricultural machinery, office machinery, electronic equipment and computer equipment;

“Raw materials” includes, but is not limited to, materials used in the production of goods and services produced or sold by TRICOR; and

“TRICOR” means the Tennessee rehabilitative initiative in correction, the inmate program that provides:

Manufacturing, business services or agricultural jobs for inmates, or any combination of those jobs;

The training and skill development necessary for inmate employment in manufacturing, business services or agricultural jobs and in placement in its post-release program; and

The marketing and sale of prison industry products and services.

Acts 1994, ch. 737, § 1; 2001, ch. 289, § 1; 2003, ch. 187, § 9; 2006, ch. 750, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 4, §§ 41-22-401 — 41-22-407 (Acts 1980, ch. 797, §§ 1-7; T.C.A. §§ 41-2601 — 41-2607; Acts 1990, ch. 772, § 1, § 2) concerning the correctional enterprises board, was repealed by Acts 1994, ch. 737, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

Acts 2006, ch. 750, § 5 provided that no expenditure of public funds pursuant to the act shall be made in violation of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, as codified in 42 U.S.C. § 2000d and Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, as codified in 42 U.S.C. § 2000e.

41-22-403. Legislative intent.

The intent of the general assembly and the policy of the state regarding the labor of inmates within the correctional system is as follows:

The department of correction is responsible for establishing and assigning inmates to the following inmate programs:

Academic and vocational education;

Special needs programming;

Inmate jobs necessary for supporting the operations of the prisons; and

Inmate jobs providing services to the community, appropriately based on the custody level of the inmate as determined by department of correction policy;

TRICOR has a mission to accomplish the following objectives:

Work inmates in manufacturing, business services or agricultural jobs;

Offset the costs of incarceration by generating revenue through the sale of products or business services;

Develop work opportunities that minimize the impact on free-world jobs;

Integrate work opportunities with education and vocational training;

Develop good work habits and marketable skills;

Develop and operate a post-release placement system; and

Provide or create other programs and services as deemed necessary by TRICOR to support an inmate's rehabilitation and reintegration efforts; and

The board created in § 41-22-404 is responsible for developing jobs, training and selecting department of correction inmates for participation in industry, business services or agricultural programs and for the sale of products or services for the purpose of generating revenue to offset the costs of incarceration.

The department is responsible for assigning inmates to TRICOR jobs that are developed by the board of directors established in § 41-22-404.

Acts 1994, ch. 737, § 1; 2001, ch. 289, § 2; 2003, ch. 187, §§ 10, 11.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 4, §§ 41-22-401 — 41-22-407 (Acts 1980, ch. 797, §§ 1-7; T.C.A. §§ 41-2601 — 41-2607; Acts 1990, ch. 772, § 1, § 2) concerning the correctional enterprises board, was repealed by Acts 1994, ch. 737, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

Attorney General Opinions. Operation of prison industry program by privately managed prison, OAG 99-023, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 28 (2/9/99).

41-22-404. Board created.

There is created a board to be known as the Tennessee rehabilitative initiative in correction (TRICOR) board, referred to in this part as “the board,” which has the authority to manage and operate the TRICOR programs for the state including its post-release placement program. The board's management and operation of TRICOR shall not interfere with the commissioner's duty to provide for the security of the institutions.

Acts 1994, ch. 737, § 1; 1996, ch. 564, § 1; 1999, ch. 390, § 1; 2001, ch. 289, § 3; 2003, ch. 187, § 12.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 4, §§ 41-22-401 — 41-22-407 (Acts 1980, ch. 797, §§ 1-7; T.C.A. §§ 41-2601 — 41-2607; Acts 1990, ch. 772, § 1, § 2) concerning the correctional enterprises board, was repealed by Acts 1994, ch. 737, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

The Tennessee rehabilitative initiative in correction (TRICOR) board, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2022. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-243.

Acts 2014, ch. 667, § 3 provided that the division of state audit shall return to the Tennessee rehabilitative initiative in correction board in 2015 for the purpose of conducting a limited audit to review actions taken by the board to address the issues raised in the findings of the July 2013 performance audit report.

41-22-405. Appointment — Membership.

The board shall be appointed by the governor and shall be accountable to the governor and shall be accountable to the general assembly through the state and local government committee of the senate and the committee of the house of representatives having oversight over corrections.

A person with a conflict of interest with TRICOR or with this state may not serve on the board.

The board shall consist of nine (9) voting members, one (1) of whom shall be the commissioner of correction, or the commissioner's designee; provided, that the commissioner of correction, or the commissioner's designee, shall not cast a vote unless a vote taken by other board members results in a tie, in which case the commissioner of correction, or the commissioner's designee, shall cast the deciding vote. All board members, other than the commissioner of correction or the commissioner's designee, shall be citizens and residents of this state.

Board members shall have the following qualifications:

At least one (1) member shall be a person of eminence in the field of manufacturing, preferably with experience in management at the executive level;

At least one (1) member shall be a person of eminence in the field of labor, preferably having served as an official representing organized labor at the state level;

At least one (1) member shall be a person of eminence in the field of agriculture, preferably having a strong decentralized farm management background;

At least one (1) member shall be a person of eminence in fiscal management of a company or organization;

One (1) member shall be an attorney with a strong background in business or corporate law;

One (1) member shall be the executive director of the Tennessee state employees association;

The remaining members shall be persons with professional experience appropriate for assisting in carrying out the mission of TRICOR, in disciplines such as sales and marketing and human resources and relations; and

In making appointments to the board, the governor shall ensure that at least one (1) person appointed to serve on the board is a member of a racial minority and at least one (1) person appointed to the board is a female.

In making initial appointments to the board, two (2) members shall be appointed to terms of one (1) year, two (2) members shall be appointed to terms of two (2) years, two (2) members shall be appointed to terms of three (3) years, and two (2) members shall be appointed to terms of four (4) years. Thereafter, all appointments shall be for terms of four (4) years. A vacancy occurring in the board shall be filled by the governor for the balance of the unexpired term. When a board member's term expires, the board may elect to have the incumbent continue to serve until a new appointment is made.

The governor may remove a board member only for good cause and, in so doing, the governor shall submit in writing to the member and to the general assembly the basis for the removal.

Acts 1994, ch. 737, § 1; 2003, ch. 187, §§ 1, 3, 4, 13-15; 2011, ch. 410, § 2(i); 2013, ch. 236, § 64; 2016, ch. 762, §§ 3, 4; 2019, ch. 345, § 68.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 4, §§ 41-22-401 — 41-22-407 (Acts 1980, ch. 797, §§ 1-7; T.C.A. §§ 41-2601 — 41-2607; Acts 1990, ch. 772, § 1, § 2) concerning the correctional enterprises board, was repealed by Acts 1994, ch. 737, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

For the Preamble to the act concerning the prohibition against establishment of a special committee if there is a standing committee on the same subject, please refer to Acts 2011, ch. 410.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “committee of the house of representatives having oversight over corrections” for “state government committee of the house of representatives” in (a)(1).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 345, § 148. May 10, 2019.

41-22-406. Powers and duties of board.

The board has such powers as are necessary to effectively carry out its mission as defined in § 41-22-403. It is the intent of the general assembly that the board should be as free as is possible to operate its facilities and to pursue its mission with the principles of free enterprise. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the board, in consultation with the commissioner of human resources, may adopt policies governing supplemental pay plans. These plans shall reward performance of the employees of TRICOR and relate to the unique responsibilities of TRICOR.

Any compensation awarded under this section shall not be considered as an addition to base pay and is further limited to the period outlined in the approved policy. Supplemental pay policies shall ensure that funds are distributed in a fair manner without bias on account of race, color, sex, age, national origin or political affiliation.

The supplemental pay policies shall be based on measurable criteria to reward performance. Pay plans shall be consistent with the mission of TRICOR and shall emphasize safety and security in the workplace.

The guidelines and criteria for receiving supplemental pay shall be developed in the best interest of all TRICOR employees and the criteria shall be clearly communicated with all affected employees. Employee input will be considered in the development process.

The state and local government committee of the senate and the committee of the house of representatives having oversight over corrections shall review any proposed supplemental pay plan and shall make comments to the commissioner of human resources prior to its implementation. Any comment shall be made within thirty (30) days after receipt by the committee of the proposed supplemental pay plan.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the board has the authority to cause to be purchased and to develop the method for purchasing raw materials, supplies, services, not to include ongoing personnel, and equipment necessary for the production and timely delivery of TRICOR products.

Notwithstanding title 12, chapter 7, part 1, or any other law to the contrary, the TRICOR board shall have the authority to authorize the preparation and use of publications for the marketing and public education needs of TRICOR products and services in order to effectively carry out its mission.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, it is the responsibility of the board to develop policies and procedures to ensure, to the extent practicable, that purchases made on behalf of TRICOR are at the lowest possible price, while at the same time ensuring quality and timely delivery. The TRICOR board of directors shall file the policies and procedures with the procurement commission for the commission's review and approval.

The board has the authority to purchase supplies, services and equipment through the procurement office and is encouraged to exercise the option to purchase through the office under title 12, chapter 3, in circumstances that are advantageous for the timely delivery of low cost, quality products.

Acts 1994, ch. 737, § 1; 1995, ch. 75, § 1; 1999, ch. 300, § 1; 2003, ch. 187, §§ 16, 17; 2006, ch. 750, § 2; 2007, ch. 60, 2008, ch. 721, § 1; 2011, ch. 295, § 15(a)-(c), 19; 2011, ch. 410, § 2(j); 2013, ch. 236, § 64; 2014, ch. 755, §§ 2, 3; 2019, ch. 345, § 69.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 4, §§ 41-22-401 — 41-22-407 (Acts 1980, ch. 797, §§ 1-7; T.C.A. §§ 41-2601 — 41-2607; Acts 1990, ch. 772, § 1, § 2) concerning the correctional enterprises board, was repealed by Acts 1994, ch. 737, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

Acts 2006, ch. 750, § 5 provided that no expenditure of public funds pursuant to the act shall be made in violation of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, as codified in 42 U.S.C. § 2000d and Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, as codified in 42 U.S.C. § 2000e.

For the Preamble to the act concerning the prohibition against establishment of a special committee if there is a standing committee on the same subject, please refer to Acts 2011, ch. 410.

Pursuant to Acts 2007, ch. 60, references to the department of personnel were changed to the department of human resources, effective April 24, 2007.

Pursuant to Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Tennessee, Acts 2014, ch. 755 took effect on April 21, 2014.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “committee of the house of representatives having oversight over corrections” for “state government committee of the house of representatives” in (a)(1)(E).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 345, § 148. May 10, 2019.

41-22-407. Executive director of TRICOR.

The board may employ an executive director of TRICOR. The board shall define the duties of the executive director and, within budgetary restrictions, establish the executive director's compensation.

The executive director shall serve at the pleasure of the board.

The executive director shall have the educational and business background and experience that will qualify the person to understand and evaluate the problems and needs of TRICOR and to direct and manage its activities for the board.

Within budgetary limitations and in consultation with the commissioner of human resources, the board, through its executive director, may employ professional and staff employees as may be appropriate for the efficient discharge of its duties to manage and operate TRICOR.

Notwithstanding § 8-30-202, the board, in consultation with the commissioner of human resources, shall have the option of declaring certain management positions, unique to the operations under the control of the board, a part of the executive service and under the exclusive control of the board.

The board, in consultation with the commissioner of human resources, shall have the option of declaring other positions, unique to the operations under the control of the board, not to be a part of the preferred service and to be under the exclusive control of the board.

Upon appointment on or after July 1, 2006, to a position defined by subdivision (d)(3), an employee is subject to a probationary period of employment, as established by the board in consultation with the commissioner of human resources. Upon successful completion of the probationary period, the employee may file a complaint concerning the application of a law, rule, or policy to appeal the dismissal, demotion, or suspension of the employee pursuant to § 8-30-318 and the rules of the department of human resources. This shall apply to all TRICOR employees already working in positions that are subsequently moved from the preferred service into a position defined by subdivision (d)(3) pursuant to this section. This section shall have no application to positions assigned to executive service pursuant to § 8-30-202, or to the positions defined by subdivision (d)(2).

Those positions that are not unique to TRICOR and are preferred service shall remain preferred service.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the board has the authority to develop procedures for recruiting and hiring qualified personnel, including preferred service, in a timely manner and at salary levels competitive with the free market, in order to ensure the production and timely delivery of low cost, quality products and to assure that the operations of TRICOR are efficiently managed and thus offset the costs of incarceration. The board has the authority to hire staff through the department of human resources and is encouraged to exercise this option when it is consistent with the principles of free enterprise.

This subsection (d) shall be implemented notwithstanding any other law to the contrary.

Acts 1994, ch. 737, § 1; 2003, ch. 187, §§ 18-20; 2003, ch. 229, § 1; 2006, ch. 750, § 3; 2012, ch. 800, § 49; 2014, ch. 755, §§ 4-8; 2016, ch. 762, §§ 5, 6.

Code Commission Notes.

In 2014, the Code Commission renumbered the subdivisions of subsection (d) by designating the former introductory paragraph as subdivision (1) and renumbering the remaining subdivisions accordingly.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 800, which rewrote the civil service provisions, substituted “§ 8-30-202” for “§ 8-30-208” in (d)(2) and for “8-30-208(b)” in (d)(4).

Former part 4, §§ 41-22-401 — 41-22-407 (Acts 1980, ch. 797, §§ 1-7; T.C.A. §§ 41-2601 — 41-2607; Acts 1990, ch. 772, § 1, § 2) concerning the correctional enterprises board, was repealed by Acts 1994, ch. 737, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

Acts 2006, ch. 750, § 5 provided that no expenditure of public funds pursuant to the act shall be made in violation of the provisions of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, as codified in 42 U.S.C. § 2000d and Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, as codified in 42 U.S.C. § 2000e.

Acts 2012, ch. 800, § 1 provided that the act, which amended subsection (d), shall be known and cited as the “Tennessee Excellence, Accountability, and Management (T.E.A.M.) Act of 2012.”

Pursuant to Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Tennessee, Acts 2014, ch. 755 took effect on April 21, 2014.

Cross-References. Prison work programs, title 41, ch. 22, part 1.

Restitution industries, title 41, ch. 6, part 2.

Road work by inmates, title 41, ch. 22, part 3.

Attorney General Opinions. Liability of TRICOR board members, OAG 06-034, 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 38 (2/14/06).

41-22-408. Contracts for services — Budgets — Operating plans — Monitoring.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the board has the authority to contract for professional services, for which reimbursement may be established on an incentive basis, and for the lease or purchase of property and equipment, to be provided for TRICOR, that is necessary for the efficient discharge of its duties to manage and operate.

The board shall establish the budget for TRICOR based on its mission and shall submit its budget directly to the commissioner of finance and administration independent from the department of correction budget.

The board shall approve the annual operating plan of TRICOR.

The board shall establish and review, as necessary, the pricing policies for products and services provided by TRICOR.

The board shall have such other powers as are necessary to accomplish the mission of TRICOR as the board establishes for itself and as are reviewed by the state and local government committee of the senate and the committee of the house of representatives having oversight over corrections and the governor.

The board has the duty to monitor TRICOR's operation and management and to impose such limitations as are prudent and necessary to assure that freedoms and powers are not abused. The board and TRICOR are subject to audit by the comptroller of the treasury as provided by law. With the approval of the comptroller of the treasury, the board may engage the services of a public accounting firm.

The board shall assist TRICOR in maintaining the quality of management processes and reporting, providing for the adequacy of financial and accounting control systems and serving as a communications channel between TRICOR managers and auditors.

The board shall adopt and publish bylaws to govern its operation and to provide an orderly change process by which its powers, responsibilities and functions may from time to time be modified. The bylaws of TRICOR shall be altered, rescinded or amended in the manner described in subdivision (f)(3)(B).

The adopted bylaws may be altered, rescinded or amended by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of any regular or special meeting of the board of directors, if a copy of the proposed amendment is submitted in writing to each director at least ten (10) days before the meeting at which a vote upon the proposal is to be taken and upon ratification by the state and local government committee of the senate, the committee of the house of representatives having oversight over corrections and the governor or the governor's designee.

Acts 1994, ch. 737, § 1; 2003, ch. 187, §§ 21-29; 2006, ch. 750, § 4; 2011, ch. 410, § 2(k); 2012, ch. 925, § 3; 2013, ch. 236, § 64; 2019, ch. 345, § 70.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006, ch. 750, § 5 provided that no expenditure of public funds pursuant to the act shall be made in violation of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, as codified in 42 U.S.C. § 2000d and Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, as codified in 42 U.S.C. § 2000e.

For the Preamble to the act concerning the prohibition against establishment of a special committee if there is a standing committee on the same subject, please refer to Acts 2011, ch. 410.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “committee of the house of representatives having oversight over corrections” for “state government committee of the house of representatives” in (e) and (f)(3)(B).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 345, § 148. May 10, 2019.

41-22-409. Meetings.

The board shall meet at least four (4) times each year to conduct business and may also hold public hearings to receive the views of the public or to gather information. The board may meet at any time on call of the chair or a majority of the members. Each member of the board or of a committee of the board shall be given reasonable written notice of each meeting of the board or the committee.

The chair may appoint such committees from the membership of the board as may be necessary to expeditiously and thoroughly perform the business of the board.

A quorum consists of a majority of the board for meetings of the board and consists of a majority of a subcommittee for meetings of a subcommittee.

Roberts' Rules of Order shall govern meetings of the board when not in conflict with specific bylaws or other rules as may be adopted by the board.

Acts 1994, ch. 737, § 1.

41-22-410. Service without compensation — Reimbursement of expenses.

Board members shall serve without compensation. Board members are entitled to reimbursement for actual travel expenses in accordance with the comprehensive state travel regulations promulgated by the commissioner of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

Acts 1994, ch. 737, § 1.

41-22-411. Performance evaluation.

Board performance shall be evaluated on the basis of the degree to which TRICOR accomplishes the elements of its mission. Performance shall be reported each year in an annual report by TRICOR through the board to the governor and to the general assembly through the state and local government committee of the senate and the committee of the house of representatives having oversight over corrections.

Acts 1994, ch. 737, § 1; 2003, ch. 187, § 30; 2011, ch. 410, § 2(l ).; 2013, ch. 236, § 64; 2019, ch. 345, § 71.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the prohibition against establishment of a special committee if there is a standing committee on the same subject, please refer to Acts 2011, ch. 410.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “committee of the house of representatives having oversight over corrections” for “state government committee of the house of representatives”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 345, § 148. May 10, 2019.

41-22-412. Volunteer status of board members.

Each board member is deemed to be a participant in a volunteer program as referenced in § 8-42-101 and is entitled to the same rights and privileges as prescribed in § 8-42-101 for volunteers.

Acts 1994, ch. 737, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. Liability of TRICOR board members, OAG 06-034, 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 38 (2/14/06).

41-22-413. Work training for juvenile offenders.

TRICOR may enter into an interagency agreement with the department of children's services to provide work training opportunities for juvenile offenders. The juvenile offenders shall at all times be kept separate and removed from adult offenders in the custody of the department of correction during the work training opportunities.

Acts 2007, ch. 472, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 994, § 1 purported to enact its provisions as § 41-22-413. Acts 2007, ch. 472, § 1 had previously enacted its provisions as § 41-22-413; therefore, the provisions of ch. 994 were codified as § 41-22-414.

41-22-414. Offsetting costs of incarceration by generating revenue — Sales of surplus equipment and materials.

It is the intent of the general assembly, as stated in § 41-22-403(2)(B), that TRICOR has as part of its mission to offset the costs of incarceration by generating revenue through the sale of products in lieu of state appropriated funds.

It is further the intent of the general assembly, as set out in § 41-22-406(a)(1)(A), that the TRICOR board be as free as possible to operate its facilities and to pursue its mission with the principles of free enterprise and that it be given the powers necessary to effectively carry out its mission.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the TRICOR board, within the principles of free enterprise, and for the purpose of carrying out its legislative intent as stated in subsection (a), is specifically authorized to sell, as surplus property, TRICOR equipment and TRICOR raw materials which have been determined by TRICOR to be obsolete, outmoded, or no longer useable by TRICOR. Such surplus property sales may be made to businesses, government or nonprofit organizations or by auction to the public. The TRICOR board may obtain the advice and assistance of the chief procurement officer and, in circumstances which are advantageous for the timely disposal of such surplus property, is encouraged to dispose of it through the procurement office under title 12, chapter 2.

Acts 2010, ch. 994, § 1; 2011, ch. 295, § 15(a), (d).

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 994, § 1 purported to enact its provisions as § 41-22-413. Acts 2007, ch. 472, § 1 had previously enacted its provisions as § 41-22-413; therefore, the provisions of ch. 994 were codified as § 41-22-414.

41-22-415. Contractual agreements to provide for work training programs.

TRICOR may enter into contractual agreements with counties and cities to provide work training programs, including the Private Sector Prison Industry Enhancement Certification Program (PS/PIEC) (P.L 96-157, as amended), for prisoners incarcerated in county and city jails.

Acts 2020, ch. 705, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 705, § 2. June 22, 2020.

41-22-109. Contracts for sale or manufacture of products.

41-22-115. Pricing of manufactured articles.

41-22-118. Classification and training of inmates.